Wisconsin, session 2025, AB729.
do enact as follows:AB729,11Section 1. 302.071 of the statutes is created to read:AB729,2,92302.071 Window access by inmates of state correctional institutions. 3(1) The department shall ensure that, by no later than October 1, 2030, in each 4state correctional institution, every inmate residential cell that utilizes an exterior 5wall of the structure has a window in the cell that is at least 1.5 square feet in size, 6that is constructed of a transparent material, and that provides at least 92 percent 7visibility to the outdoors. The requirement under this subsection applies only if the 8state correctional institution will remain structurally sound with the windows in 9place.AB729,2,1510(2) The warden or superintendent shall ensure that each inmate in a state 11correctional institution is permitted to view the outdoors through a transparent 12window that provides at least 92 percent visibility to the outdoors for at least 3 13hours per day unless the inmate is subject to a prison lockdown or is being held in 14solitary confinement. The requirement under this subsection may be met in any of 15the following ways:AB729,2,1616(a) By time spent outdoors.AB729,2,1917(b) By time spent in the inmate’s residential cell if the cell has a window that 18is constructed of a transparent material and that provides at least 92 percent 19visibility to the outdoors.AB729,3,420(c) If the inmate’s residential cell does not have a window that is constructed 1of a transparent material and that provides at least 92 percent visibility to the 2outdoors, by time spent in another location within the state correctional institution 3where the inmate may access a window that provides at least 92 percent visibility to 4the outdoors.AB729,25Section 2. 302.072 of the statutes is created to read:AB729,3,126302.072 Window access by inmates of county jails. (1) The sheriff shall 7ensure that, by no later than October 1, 2030, in the county jail, every inmate 8residential cell that utilizes an exterior wall of the structure has a window in the 9cell that is at least 1.5 square feet in size, that is constructed of a transparent 10material, and that provides at least 92 percent visibility to the outdoors. The 11requirement under this subsection applies only if the county jail will remain 12structurally sound with the windows in place.AB729,3,1713(2) The sheriff shall ensure that each inmate in a county jail is permitted to 14view the outdoors through a transparent window that provides at least 92 percent 15visibility to the outdoors for at least 3 hours per day unless the inmate is subject to 16a jail lockdown or is being held in solitary confinement. The requirement under 17this subsection may be met in any of the following ways:AB729,3,1818(a) By time spent outdoors.AB729,3,2119(b) By time spent in the inmate’s residential cell if the cell has a window that 20is constructed of a transparent material and that provides at least 92 percent 21visibility to the outdoors.AB729,4,222(c) If the inmate’s residential cell does not have a window that is constructed 23of a transparent material and that provides at least 92 percent visibility to the 1outdoors, by time spent in another location within the county jail where the inmate 2may access a window that provides at least 92 percent visibility to the outdoors.AB729,33Section 3. Fiscal changes.AB729,4,114(1) Installation of windows in state correctional institutions. In the 5schedule under s. 20.005 (3) for the appropriation to the department of corrections 6under s. 20.410 (1) (aa), the dollar amount for fiscal year 2025-26 is increased by 7$500,000 to install windows in state correctional institutions as required under s. 8302.071 (1). In the schedule under s. 20.005 (3) for the appropriation to the 9department of corrections under s. 20.410 (1) (aa), the dollar amount for fiscal year 102026-27 is increased by $3,000,000 to install windows in state correctional 11institutions as required under s. 302.071 (1).AB729,412Section 4. Effective date.AB729,4,1513(1) Outdoor viewing requirements. The treatment of ss. 302.071 (2) and 14302.072 (2) take effect on the first day of the 7th month beginning after the effective 15date of this subsection.AB729,4,1616